test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_puasui_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - puásui: # MLO, ok 
    puásui+N+Sg+Nom:  puásui
    puásui+N+Sg+Gen:  poccuu
    puásui+N+Sg+Acc:  poccuu
    puásui+N+Sg+Ill:  poccui
    puásui+N+Sg+Loc:  poccust
    puásui+N+Sg+Com:  poccuin
    puásui+N+Sg+Abe:  poccuuttáá
    puásui+N+Ess:  [puáˊsujin, poccun]
    puásui+N+Par:  [puáˊsujid, poccud]
    puásui+N+Pl+Nom:  poccuuh
    puásui+N+Pl+Gen:  poccui
    puásui+N+Pl+Acc:  poccuid
    puásui+N+Pl+Ill:  poccuid
    puásui+N+Pl+Loc:  poccuin
    puásui+N+Pl+Com:  poccuiguin
    puásui+N+Pl+Abe:  poccuittáá
    
  Noun - almai: # MLO, ok 
    almai+N+Sg+Nom:  aˊlmai
    almai+N+Sg+Gen:  almaa
    almai+N+Sg+Acc:  almaa
    almai+N+Sg+Ill:  [almai, aˊlmajân]
    almai+N+Sg+Loc:  almast
    almai+N+Sg+Com:  almain
    almai+N+Sg+Abe:  almaattáá
    almai+N+Ess:  aˊlmajin
    almai+N+Par:  aˊlmajid
    almai+N+Pl+Nom:  almaah
    almai+N+Pl+Gen:  almai
    almai+N+Pl+Acc:  almaid
    almai+N+Pl+Ill:  almaid
    almai+N+Pl+Loc:  almain
    almai+N+Pl+Com:  almaiguin
    almai+N+Pl+Abe:  almaittáá    

  Noun - puájui: # MLO, ok 
    puájui+N+Sg+Nom:  puájui
    puájui+N+Sg+Gen:  poijuu
    puájui+N+Sg+Acc:  poijuu
    puájui+N+Sg+Ill:  poijui
    puájui+N+Sg+Loc:  poijust
    puájui+N+Sg+Com:  poijuin
    puájui+N+Sg+Abe:  poijuuttáá
    puájui+N+Ess:  puáˊjujin
    puájui+N+Par:  puáˊjujid
    puájui+N+Pl+Nom:  poijuuh
    puájui+N+Pl+Gen:  poijui
    puájui+N+Pl+Acc:  poijuid
    puájui+N+Pl+Ill:  poijuid
    puájui+N+Pl+Loc:  poijuin
    puájui+N+Pl+Com:  poijuiguin
    puájui+N+Pl+Abe:  poijuittáá
    
  Noun - suálui: # MLO, ok 
    suálui+N+Sg+Nom:  [suálui, suáˊloi] #suá´loi to be accepted 
    suálui+N+Sg+Gen:  suolˊluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Acc:  suolˊluu
    suálui+N+Sg+Ill:  suolˊlui
    suálui+N+Sg+Loc:  suolˊlust
    suálui+N+Sg+Com:  suolˊluin
    suálui+N+Sg+Abe:  suolˊluuttáá
    suálui+N+Ess:  [suáˊlujin, suolˊlun]
    suálui+N+Par:  [suáˊlujid, suolˊlud]
    suálui+N+Pl+Nom:  suolˊluuh
    suálui+N+Pl+Gen:  suolˊlui
    suálui+N+Pl+Acc:  suolˊluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Ill:  suolˊluid
    suálui+N+Pl+Loc:  suolˊluin
    suálui+N+Pl+Com:  suolˊluiguin
    suálui+N+Pl+Abe:  suolˊluittáá

  Noun - čuálgui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Nom:  čuálgui
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Gen:  čuolˊguu
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Acc:  čuolˊguu
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Ill:  čuolˊgui
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Loc:  čuolˊgust
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Com:  čuolˊguin
    čuálgui+N+Sg+Abe:  čuolˊguuttáá
    čuálgui+N+Ess:  čuáˊlgujin
    čuálgui+N+Par:  čuáˊlgujid
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Nom:  čuolˊguuh
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Gen:  čuolˊgui
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Acc:  čuolˊguid
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Ill:  čuolˊguid
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Loc:  čuolˊguin
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Com:  čuolˊguiguin
    čuálgui+N+Pl+Abe:  čuolˊguittáá

  Noun - cuábui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift
    cuábui+N+Sg+Nom:  cuábui
    cuábui+N+Sg+Gen:  cuobˊbuu
    cuábui+N+Sg+Acc:  cuobˊbuu
    cuábui+N+Sg+Ill:  cuobˊbui
    cuábui+N+Sg+Loc:  cuobˊbust
    cuábui+N+Sg+Com:  cuobˊbuin
    cuábui+N+Sg+Abe:  cuobˊbuuttáá
    cuábui+N+Ess:  [cuáˊbujin, cuobˊbun]
    cuábui+N+Par:  [cuáˊbujid, cuobˊbud]
    cuábui+N+Pl+Nom:  cuobˊbuuh
    cuábui+N+Pl+Gen:  cuobˊbui
    cuábui+N+Pl+Acc:  cuobˊbuid
    cuábui+N+Pl+Ill:  cuobˊbuid
    cuábui+N+Pl+Loc:  cuobˊbuin
    cuábui+N+Pl+Com:  cuobˊbuiguin
    cuábui+N+Pl+Abe:  cuobˊbuittáá

  Noun - puárui: # MLO, ok Hist oa-dift
    puárui+N+Sg+Nom:  [puárui, puáˊroi] # puá´roi: to be accepted
    puárui+N+Sg+Gen:  porruu
    puárui+N+Sg+Acc:  porruu
    puárui+N+Sg+Ill:  porrui
    puárui+N+Sg+Loc:  porrust
    puárui+N+Sg+Com:  porruin
    puárui+N+Sg+Abe:  porruuttáá
    puárui+N+Ess:  [puáˊrujin, porrun] # puá´rojin, to be accepted
    puárui+N+Par:  [puáˊrujid, porrud] # puá´rojid, to be accepted
    puárui+N+Pl+Nom:  porruuh
    puárui+N+Pl+Gen:  porrui
    puárui+N+Pl+Acc:  porruid
    puárui+N+Pl+Ill:  porruid
    puárui+N+Pl+Loc:  porruin
    puárui+N+Pl+Com:  porruiguin
    puárui+N+Pl+Abe:  porruittáá

  Noun - kuávsui: # MLO, ok Hist uá-dift
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávsui
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Gen:  kuokˊsuu
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Acc:  kuokˊsuu
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Ill:  kuokˊsui
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Loc:  kuokˊsust
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Com:  kuokˊsuin
    kuávsui+N+Sg+Abe:  kuokˊsuuttáá
    kuávsui+N+Ess:  kuáˊvsujin
    kuávsui+N+Par:  kuáˊvsujid
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Nom:  kuokˊsuuh
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Gen:  kuokˊsui
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Acc:  kuokˊsuid
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Ill:  kuokˊsuid
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Loc:  kuokˊsuin
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Com:  kuokˊsuiguin
    kuávsui+N+Pl+Abe:  kuokˊsuittáá
